ko: 스티치 유형: 아플리케; 블라인드 헴; 버튼홀(4단계); 버튼홀(자동); 체인 스티치; 커버 스티치; 다닝; 장식 스티치; 헤밍(롤/내로우); 레터링/모노그램; 락스티치; 오버캐스트/오버에지; 오버록(서저); 퀼팅 스티치; 새틴 스티치; 직선; 스트레치 스티치; 쌍침 가능; 지그재그; 기타
ja: ステッチタイプ: アップリケ; まつり縫い; ボタンホール (4ステップ); ボタンホール (自動); チェーンステッチ; カバーステッチ; ダーニング; 飾り縫い; 裾上げ (巻き縫い/細幅); レタリング/モノグラム; 本縫い; かがり縫い/オーバーエッジ; オーバーロック (ロックミシン); キルティングステッチ; サテンステッチ; 直線縫い; 伸縮縫い; 2本針対応; ジグザグ縫い; その他
lt-LT: Dygsnių tipai: Aplikacija; Paslėpta siūlė; Kilpų siuvimas (4 žingsnių); Kilpų siuvimas (automatinis); Grandinėlės dygsnis; Plokščias dygsnis; Adymo dygsnis; Dekoratyviniai dygsniai; Apsiuvimas (rumbuotas / siauras); Raidės / monogramos; Šaudyklinis dygsnis; Apmėtymo dygsnis; Overlokas; Dygsniavimo dygsniai; Satininis dygsnis; Tiesus; Tamprieji dygsniai; Pritaikyta dvigubai adatai; Zigzagas; Kita
hu: Öltéstípusok: Applikáció; Rejtett öltés; Gomblyuk (4 lépéses); Gomblyuk (automatikus); Láncöltés; Fedőöltés; Stoppolás; Díszítő öltések; Szegés (sodrott/keskeny); Betűk/Monogramok; Huroköltés; Szegőöltés; Overlock; Tűzőöltések; Laposöltés; Egyenes; Sztreccs öltések; Ikertűs használat; Cikkcakk; Egyéb
el: Τύποι βελονιών: Απλικέ; Κρυφό στρίφωμα; Κουμπότρυπα (4 βημάτων); Κουμπότρυπα (αυτόματη); Αλυσιδωτή βελονιά; Πλακοραφή; Μαντάρισμα; Διακοσμητικές βελονιές; Στρίφωμα (ρολό/στενό); Γράμματα/Μονογράμματα; Κλειστή βελονιά; Καρύκωμα/Πλακοραφή; Κοπτοράπτης (Overlock); Βελονιές καπιτονέ; Πλακέ βελονιά; Ίσια βελονιά; Ελαστικές βελονιές; Δυνατότητα διπλής βελόνας; Ζιγκ ζαγκ; Άλλο
nb: Stingtyper: Applikasjon; Blindsøm; Knapphull (4-trinns); Knapphull (automatisk); Kjedesøm; Dekksøm; Stoppesøm; Pyntesømmer; Faldsøm (rullet/smal); Bokstaver / monogrammer; Stikksøm; Kastesøm; Overlock; Quiltesømmer; Satengsøm; Rettsøm; Elastiske sømmer; Kompatibel med tvillingnål; Sikksakk; Annet
sk-SK: Typy stehov: Aplikácia; Slepý steh; Gombíková dierka (4-kroková); Gombíková dierka (automatická); Retiazkový steh; Krycí steh; Látací steh; Dekoratívne stehy; Lemovanie (rolované/úzke); Písmo/monogramy; Viazaný steh; Obrubovací steh; Overlock; Prešívacie stehy (quilting); Saténový steh; Rovný steh; Strečové stehy; Na dvojitú ihlu; Cik-cak; Iné
nl: Steektypes: Applicatie; Blindzoom; Knoopsgat (4-staps); Knoopsgat (automatisch); Kettingsteek; Coversteek; Stopsteek; Siersteken; Zomen (rolzoom/smal); Letters/monogrammen; Stiksteek; Afwerksteek / overlock; Overlock (lockmachine); Quiltsteken; Cordonsteek; Recht; Stretchsteken; Geschikt voor tweelingnaald; Zigzag; Overig
hr-HR: Vrste šavova: Aplikacija; Skriveni porub; Rupica za gumb (u 4 koraka); Rupica za gumb (automatska); Lančani bod; Pokrivni bod; Štopanje; Ukrasni bodovi; Porubljivanje (uvijeno/usko); Pisanje slova / monogrami; Ravni bod (lockstitch); Obrubljivanje; Overlock (endlerica); Bodovi za prošivanje (quilting); Satenski bod; Ravni bod; Rastezljivi bodovi; Mogućnost korištenja dvostruke igle; Cik-cak; Ostalo
pt-BR: Ponto tipos: Aplique; Bainha invisível; Casa de botão (4 passos); Casa de botão (automática); Ponto corrente; Galoneira; Cerzido; Pontos decorativos; Bainha (enrolada/estreita); Letras/Monogramas; Ponto fixo; Chuleio/Overloque; Overloque; Pontos de quilting; Ponto cheio; Reto; Pontos elásticos; Compatível com agulha dupla; Zigue-zague; Outro
cs: Typy stehů: Nášivkový; Slepý steh; Knoflíková dírka (4kroková); Knoflíková dírka (automatická); Řetízkový steh; Krycí steh; Látací; Dekorativní stehy; Lemovací steh (rolovací/úzký); Písmo/monogramy; Vázaný steh; Obšívací steh; Overlock; Quiltovací stehy; Saténový steh; Rovný; Pružné stehy; Pro dvojjehlu; Cik-cak; Jiné
en: Stitch types: Appliqué; Blind hem; Buttonhole (4-step); Buttonhole (automatic); Chainstitch; Coverstitch; Darning; Decorative stitches; Hemming (rolled/narrow); Lettering/Monograms; Lockstitch; Overcast/Overedge; Overlock (serger); Quilting stitches; Satin stitch; Straight; Stretch stitches; Twin-needle capable; Zigzag; Other
ro-RO: Tipuri de cusături: Aplice; Tiv ascuns; Butonieră (în 4 pași); Butonieră (automată); Cusătură tip lanț; Cusătură de acoperire; Stopare; Cusături decorative; Surfilare tiv (rulat/îngust); Litere/Monograme; Cusătură simplă (lockstitch); Surfilare/Tivire; Surfilare (overlock); Cusături matlasare; Cusătură satin (plat); Dreaptă; Cusături elastice; Compatibil cu ac dublu; Zigzag; Altele
pt-PT: Tipos de pontos: Aplique; Bainha invisível; Casa de botão (4 passos); Casa de botão (automática); Ponto de cadeia; Ponto de recobrimento; Cerzido; Pontos decorativos; Bainha (enrolada/estreita); Letras/monogramas; Ponto preso; Chuleio/remate; Overloque (corte e costura); Pontos de acolchoamento; Ponto cheio; A direito; Pontos elásticos; Compatível com agulha dupla; Ziguezague; Outro
zh-TW: 縫紉類型: 貼花; 暗縫; 鈕扣孔 (四步驟); 鈕扣孔 (自動); 鎖鏈縫; 繃縫; 織補; 裝飾縫線; 捲邊 (捲邊/窄邊); 字母/花押字; 平車縫; 拷克/包縫; 拷克 (車邊); 絎縫; 緞面縫; 直線; 彈性縫線; 支援雙針; 鋸齒縫; 其他
ru: Типы стежков: Аппликация; Потайной шов; Пуговичная петля (4-шаговая); Пуговичная петля (автомат); Цепной стежок; Плоский шов (распошивальный); Штопка; Декоративные строчки; Подрубочный шов (роликовый/узкий); Вышивка букв/монограмм; Челночный стежок; Обметочный шов; Оверлок; Строчки для квилтинга; Гладь; Прямая строчка; Эластичные строчки; Шитье двойной иглой; Зигзаг; Другое
vi: Các loại đường khâu: Appliqué; May giấu mũi; Thùa khuyết (4 bước); Thùa khuyết (tự động); Móc xích; May trần đè; Mạng vải; Mũi khâu trang trí; Cuốn biên (cuộn/hẹp); Chữ/Chữ lồng; May thắt nút; Vắt sổ/Bọc mép; Vắt sổ (máy vắt sổ); Mũi chần gòn; Thêu satin; Thẳng; Mũi may vải co giãn; Có thể dùng kim đôi; Zigzag; Khác
fr: Types de points: Appliqué; Ourlet invisible; Boutonnière (4 étapes); Boutonnière (automatique); Point de chaînette; Point de recouvrement; Reprisage; Points décoratifs; Ourlet (roulotté/étroit); Lettrage/Monogrammes; Point noué; Surjet/Surfilage; Surjet (surjeteuse); Points de matelassage; Point de bourdon; Droit; Points extensibles; Compatible avec aiguille double; Zigzag; Autre
de: Sticharten: Applikation; Blindstich; Knopfloch (4-Stufen); Knopfloch (Automatik); Kettenstich; Coverstich; Stopfen; Zierstiche; Säumen (Rollsaum/Schmal); Schrift/Monogramme; Steppstich; Überwendlich/Versäubern; Overlock; Quiltstiche; Satinstich; Geradstich; Stretchstiche; Zwillingsnadelfähig; Zickzack; Andere
zh-CN: 针迹类型: 贴布绣; 暗缝; 锁扣眼（4 步式）; 锁扣眼（自动）; 链式线迹; 绷缝; 织补; 装饰线迹; 折边（卷边/窄边）; 字母/交织字母; 平缝; 包边缝/拷边; 包缝（拷边机）; 绗缝线迹; 缎纹缝; 直线缝; 弹力线迹; 支持双针; 曲折缝; 其他
tr: Dikiş türleri: Aplike; Gizli dikiş; İlik (4 adımlı); İlik (otomatik); Zincir dikiş; Reçme dikişi; Örme; Dekoratif dikişler; Etek baskısı (kıvrık/dar); Yazı/monogramlar; Kilit dikiş; Sürfile/kenar overlok; Overlok; Kapitone dikişler; Saten dikiş; Düz; Esnek dikişler; Çift iğne uyumlu; Zigzag; Diğer
es: Tipos de puntadas: Aplicación; Dobladillo invisible; Ojal (4 pasos); Ojal (automático); Punto de cadeneta; Punto de recubrimiento; Zurcido; Puntadas decorativas; Dobladillo (enrollado/estrecho); Letras/monogramas; Pespunte; Sobreyhilado/remallado; Overlock (remalladora); Puntadas para acolchado; Punto de satén; Recto; Puntadas elásticas; Compatible con aguja doble; Zigzag; Otro
it: Tipi di punti: Appliqué; Orlo invisibile; Asola (a 4 tempi); Asola (automatica); Punto catenella; Punto copertura; Rammendo; Punti decorativi; Orlatura (arrotolata/stretta); Lettering/Monogrammi; Punto annodato; Punto cordoncino/sopraggitto; Tagliacuci (overlock); Punti trapuntatura; Punto raso; Dritto; Punti elastici; Compatibile con ago gemello; Zigzag; Altro
bg-BG: Видове шевове: Апликация; Скрит подгъв; Илици (4-стъпкови); Илици (автоматични); Верижен бод; Покривен бод; Кърпене; Декоративни бодове; Подгъване (навито/тясно); Букви/монограми; Двоен бод; Обметен бод/оверлог; Оверлог; Бодове за капитониране; Сатенен бод; Прав; Еластични бодове; Възможност за двойна игла; Зигзаг; Друго
th: ประเภทของตะเข็บ: เย็บปะติดปะต่อลาย; สอยซ่อนด้าย; ถักรังดุม (4 ขั้นตอน); ถักรังดุม (อัตโนมัติ); เย็บลูกโซ่; เย็บโคเวอร์สติช; ชุนผ้า; เย็บลวดลายตกแต่ง; เย็บพับริม (ม้วน/แคบ); ตัวอักษร/ลายโมโนแกรม; เย็บล็อกสติช; พันริม/โพ้งริม; โพ้ง (จักรโพ้ง); เย็บควิลต์; ปักทึบ; ตรง; ตะเข็บผ้ายืด; รองรับเข็มคู่; ซิกแซ็ก; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrste vbodov: Aplikacija; Slepi šiv; Gumbnica (4-stopenjska); Gumbnica (avtomatska); Verižni šiv; Prekrivni šiv; Štopanje; Okrasni šivi; Robljenje (zavito/ozko); Napisi/monogrami; Vezani šiv; Obšivanje; Overlock (robni šiv); Šivi za prešivanje; Satenasti šiv; Ravno; Raztegljivi šivi; Možnost dvojne igle; Cikcak; Drugo
da: Stingtyper: Applikation; Blindsting; Knaphul (4-trin); Knaphul (automatisk); Kædesøm; Dæksøm; Stopning; Pyntesømme; Oplægning (rullet/smal); Bogstaver/monogrammer; Stikkesting; Overkastning/overlocksøm; Overlock (serger); Quiltesømme; Satinsøm; Ligesøm; Stræksømme; Kan sy med tvillingenål; Zigzag; Andet
fi: Ommeltyypit: Applikointi; Piilo-ommel; Napinläpi (4-vaiheinen); Napinläpi (automaattinen); Ketjutikki; Peitetikki; Parsinta; Koristeompeleet; Päärmäys (rullapäärme / kapea); Kirjaimet/monogrammit; Lukkotikki; Yliluottelu/saumaus; Saumuriommel; Tikkausompeleet; Laakaommel; Suora ommel; Jousto-ompeleet; Kaksoisneulavalmius; Siksak; Muu
sv: Stygntyper: Applikation; Blindsöm; Knapphål (4-stegs); Knapphål (automatiskt); Kedjesöm; Täcksöm; Stoppning; Dekorsömmar; Fållning (rullad/smal); Bokstäver/monogram; Skyttelsöm; Kastsöm/overlock; Overlock; Quiltsömmar; Plattsöm; Raksöm; Stretchsömmar; Kapacitet för tvillingnål; Sicksack; Övrigt
pl: Rodzaje ściegów: Aplikacja; Ścieg kryty; Dziurka do guzika (4-stopniowa); Dziurka do guzika (automatyczna); Ścieg łańcuszkowy; Ścieg drabinkowy (Coverstitch); Ścieg cerujący; Ściegi ozdobne; Ścieg obrębiający (rolujący/wąski); Litery/monogramy; Stębnówka (ścieg stebnowy); Ścieg obrzucający; Owerlok; Ściegi do pikowania; Ścieg satynowy (atłasowy); Ścieg prosty; Ściegi elastyczne; Do szycia podwójną igłą; Ścieg zygzakowy; Inny